West Virginia, session 2026, SB340.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Funeral Service Examiners. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-6-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Funeral Service Examiners to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 10, 2025, relating to the Board of Funeral Service Examiners (funeral directors, embalmers, apprentices, courtesy card holders, and funeral establishment requirements, 6 CSR 01), is authorized.